Washington statutes.
RCW 42.45.140

Short form certificates.

The following short form certificates of notarial acts are sufficient for the purposes indicated, if completed with the information required by RCW 42.45.130 (1) through (4) and 42.45.280:

(1) For an acknowledgment in an individual capacity:

State of .......

County of .......

This record was acknowledged before me on (date) by (name(s) of individuals).

. . . .

(Signature of notary public)

(Stamp)

. . . .

(Title of office)

My commission expires:

. . . .

(date)

(2) For an acknowledgment in a representative capacity:

State of .......

County of .......

This record was acknowledged before me on (date) by (name(s) of individuals) as (type of authority, such as officer or trustee) of (name of party on behalf of whom record was executed).

. . . .

(Signature of notary public)

(Stamp)

. . . .

(Title of office)

My commission expires:

. . . .

(date)

(3) For verification on oath or affirmation:

State of .......

County of .......

Signed and sworn to (or affirmed) before me on (date) by (name(s) of individuals making statement).

. . . .

(Signature of notary public)

(Stamp)

. . . .

(Title of office)

My commission expires:

. . . .

(date)

(4) For witnessing or attesting a signature:

State of .......

County of .......

Signed or attested before me on (date) by (name(s) of individuals).

. . . .

(Signature of notary public)

(Stamp)

. . . .

(Title of office)

My commission expires:

. . . .

(date)

(5) For certifying or attesting a copy of a record:

State of .......

County of .......

I certify that this is a true and correct copy of a record in the possession of ........

Dated:

. . . .

. . . .

(Signature of notary public)

(Stamp)

. . . .

(Title of office)

My commission expires:

. . . .

(date)

(6) For certifying the occurrence of an event or the performance of any act:

State of .......

County of .......

I certify that the event described in this document has occurred or been performed.

Dated:

. . . .

. . . .

(Signature of notary public)

(Stamp)

. . . .

(Title of office)

My commission expires:

. . . .

(date)

[ 2019 c 154 s 5; 2017 c 281 s 16.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 154: See note following RCW 42.45.280.